Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "County Fair
Modernization Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 15-97 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Whenever a member of the County Free Fair Association Board of
Directors is absent from more than fifty percent (50%) of all
meetings of the Board, regular and special, held within any period
Req. No. 10275 Page 1

of f our consecutive meetings, that member shall thereupon cease to
hold office, and that position shall be considered vacant.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 15-98 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Members of the County Free Fair Association Board may take a
recommended training course offered by Oklahoma State University's
extension office, delivered online, to better serve in their elected
position.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10275 MJ 01/14/25












Req. No. 10275 Page 2